Nebraska, session 109, LB1004.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1004 LB1004
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 53-103.02, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
53-103.02 (1) Alcoholic liquor includes alcohol, spirits, wine,
beer, and any liquid or solid, patented or not, containing one-half of
one percent or more alcohol by volume alcohol, spirits, wine, or beer and
capable of being consumed as a beverage by a human being. Alcoholic
liquor also includes confections or candy that contains more than one-
half of one percent alcohol.
(2) The Nebraska Liquor Control Act does not apply to (a) alcohol
used in the manufacture of denatured alcohol produced in accordance with
acts of Congress and regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant to such
acts, (b) flavoring extracts, syrups, medicinal, mechanical, scientific,
culinary, or toilet preparations, or food products unfit for beverage
purposes, but the act applies to alcoholic liquor used in the
manufacture, preparation, or compounding of such products or confections
or candy that contains more than one-half of one percent alcohol, or (c)
wine intended for use and used by any church or religious organization
for sacramental purposes, or (d) nonalcoholic beer, except as provided in
section 53-160.02 relating to selling or furnishing nonalcoholic beer to
minors.
Sec. 2. Section 53-103.03, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
53-103.03 (1) Beer means a beverage obtained by alcoholic
fermentation of an infusion or concoction of barley or other grain, malt,
and hops in water and includes, but is not limited to, beer, ale, stout,
lager beer, porter, near beer, flavored malt beverage, and hard cider.
(2) Beer does not include nonalcoholic beer.
Sec. 3. Section 53-103.24, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
53-103.24 Nonalcoholic beer Near beer means beer containing less
than one-half of one percent of alcohol by volume.
-2-

LB1004 LB1004
2026 2026
Sec. 4. Section 53-160.02, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
53-160.02 No person shall sell or furnish nonalcoholic beer to any
minor. The manufacture, distribution, sale, and purchase of near beer
shall be subject to all provisions of the Nebraska Liquor Control Act,
except taxation provisions, to which the manufacture, distribution, sale,
and purchase of beer are subject.
Sec. 5. Original sections 53-103.02, 53-103.03, 53-103.24, and
53-160.02, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, are repealed.
-3-